Utah statutes.
53A-2-113.   School district consolidation -- State funding of consolidated districts.

When districts consolidate, payments made by the state under Title 53A, Chapter 17a, Minimum School Program Act, shall continue for a period of five years from the date of consolidation on the same basis as if no consolidation had occurred.  At the end of the five-year period, the consolidated district shall receive funding as a single district.



Amended by Chapter 4, 1993 General Session

